Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.08
Cigar shop, defined.

Cigar shop means an establishment operated by a holder of a Class C liquor license which:

(1) Does not sell food;

(2) In addition to selling alcohol, annually receives ten percent or more of its gross revenue from the sale of cigars, other tobacco products, and tobacco-related products, except from the sale of cigarettes as defined in section 69-2702. A cigar shop shall not discount alcohol if sold in combination with cigars or other tobacco products and tobacco-related products;

(3) Has a walk-in humidor on the premises; and

(4) Does not permit the smoking of cigarettes.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 16;

Laws 2015, LB118, § 3.